North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-35 Legislative Management
54-35-15.2.
Information technology committee — Powers and duties.

The information technology committee has continuing existence and may meet and conduct its business during the legislative session and in the interim between sessions. The committee shall:

Meet at least once each calendar quarter.

Receive a report from the chief information officer of the state at each meeting.

Review the business plan of the information technology department.

Review macro-level issues relating to information technology.

Review the activities of the information technology department.

Review statewide information technology standards.

Review the statewide information technology plan.

Review information technology efficiency and security.

Review established or proposed information technology programs and information technology acquisition by the executive and judicial branches.

Except as provided in subsection 11, receive and review information, including a project startup report summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout report summarizing the project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from the information technology department and the affected agency regarding any major information technology project of an executive branch agency. For the purposes of this subsection, a major project is a project with a total cost of five hundred thousand dollars or more.

Receive and review information, including a project startup report summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout report summarizing the project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from the state board of higher education regarding any major project of the state board of higher education or any institution under the control of the state board of higher education if the project:

Significantly impacts the statewide wide area network, including the campus access routers;

Impacts the statewide library system; or

Is an administrative project. An administrative project is a project that directly collects, aggregates, modifies, stores, or reports institutional student, financial, or human resources records or data and is provided primarily for administrative purposes.

For the purposes of this subsection, a major project is a project with a total cost of five hundred thousand dollars or more.

Receive and review information from the information technology department and the affected agency regarding any information technology project of an executive branch agency with a total cost of between one hundred thousand and five hundred thousand dollars as determined necessary by the information technology department.

Receive a report from the chief information officer regarding the recommendations of the state information technology advisory committee relating to the prioritization of proposed major information technology projects and other information technology issues.

Receive and review information, including a project startup report summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout report summarizing the project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, from the affected legislative or judicial branch agency regarding any information technology project of the legislative or judicial branch with a total cost of five hundred thousand dollars or more.

Receive information from the state board of higher education regarding higher education information technology planning, services, and major projects.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 466, § 2; 2001, ch. 500, § 1; 2007, ch. 490, § 1; 2007, ch. 491, § 2; 2007, ch. 21, § 10; 2007, ch. 154, § 3; 2013, ch. 412, § 1; 2015, ch. 385, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 385, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 412, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-35-15.3.
Information technology project quality assurance — Information technology committee review — Suspension of funds.

The information technology committee may review any information technology project or information technology plan. If the committee determines that the project or plan is at risk of failing to achieve its intended results, the committee may recommend to the office of management and budget the suspension of the expenditure of moneys appropriated for a project or plan. The office of management and budget may suspend the expenditure authority if the office of management and budget agrees with the recommendation of the committee.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 466, § 3.

54-35-15.4.
Information technology committee — Information technology reviews.

The information technology committee may request the state auditor to conduct an information technology compliance review. The review may consist of an audit of an agency’s information technology management, information technology planning, compliance with information technology plans, and compliance with information technology standards and policies or an audit of statewide compliance with specific information technology standards and policies.

Source:

S.L. 2003 Sp., ch. 665, § 15.

54-35-16.
Authority to determine if legislative assembly meets.

The legislative management may issue a call for the legislative assembly to convene after it has adjourned under subsection 2 of section 54-03-02. The length of a legislative session called under this section may not exceed the number of natural days available under the constitution which have not been used by that legislative assembly. The legislative management may exercise this authority, and the legislative assembly shall meet, regardless of whether the motion to close the regular session of the legislative assembly was to recess to a time certain, adjourn to a time certain, or adjourn sine die.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 494, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 70.

54-35-17.
Retention of legal counsel.

When the legislative assembly is in session, either house by resolution may authorize, or both houses by concurrent resolution may direct, the legislative council to appoint or retain legal counsel to appear in, commence, prosecute, defend, or intervene in any action, suit, matter, cause, or proceeding in any court or agency when determined necessary or advisable to protect the official interests of the legislative branch. When the legislative assembly is not in session, the legislative management, by a majority vote, may authorize the legislative council to appoint or retain legal counsel to appear in, commence, prosecute, defend, or intervene in any action, suit, matter, cause, or proceeding in any court or agency when determined necessary or advisable to protect the official interests of the legislative branch. Section 54-12-08 does not apply to a person appointed or retained under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 1, § 3; 1995, ch. 519, § 1; 1997, ch. 456, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 71.

54-35-18.
Energy development and transmission committee.

The legislative management, during each biennium, shall appoint an energy development and transmission committee in the same manner as the legislative management appoints other interim committees. The legislative management shall appoint six members of the house of representatives, four of whom must be from the majority political party and two of whom must be from the minority political party, and six members of the senate, four of whom must be from the majority political party and two of whom must be from the minority political party. The chairman of the legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the statutes and procedure governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees. The committee shall study the impact of a comprehensive energy policy for the state and the development of each facet of the energy industry, from the obtaining of the raw natural resource to the sale of the final product in this state, other states, and other countries. The study may include the review of and recommendations relating to policy affecting extraction, generation, processing, transmission, transportation, marketing, distribution, and use of energy.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 458, § 1; 2003, ch. 36, § 19; 2007, ch. 468, § 1; 2007, ch. 204, § 4; 2009, ch. 482, §
72; 2011, ch. 411, § 1.

54-35-18.1.
Electric industry competition committee — Composition.

Expired under S.L. 2003, ch. 36, § 20.

54-35-18.2.
Electric industry competition committee — Study areas.

Expired under S.L. 2003, ch. 36, § 21.

54-35-18.3.
Electric industry competition committee — Recommendations. [Repealed]

Expired pursuant to S.L. 1999, ch. 467, § 3.

54-35-19.
Use of fees — Appropriation.

All fees received by the legislative council and the legislative assembly for providing legislative information services and copies of legislative documents must be deposited in the legislative services fund in the state treasury. The legislative services fund is a revolving fund with an authorized ceiling of two hundred fifty thousand dollars. All moneys transferred into the fund, moneys deposited in the fund, and earnings on moneys in the fund are appropriated to the legislative council for use in improving and enhancing legislative information services and the preparation of legislative documents. The fund is not subject to section 54-44.1-11.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 30, § 3.

54-35-20.
National conference of insurance legislators — Appointment of representatives.

The chairman of the legislative management, in consultation with the insurance commissioner, shall appoint two members of the house of representatives and two members of the senate to represent the state at functions of the national conference of insurance legislators. Each member shall serve a two-year term. If a member is unable to complete the member’s term, the chairman of the legislative management shall appoint another member to complete the term. The insurance commissioner shall pay the necessary expenses of the legislative members for attending functions of the national conference of insurance legislators.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 32, § 7; 2009, ch. 482, §
97.

54-35-21.
No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 — Interim committee — Appointment — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 162, § 18.

54-35-22.
Workers’ compensation review committee.

During each interim, a legislative management’s interim workers’ compensation review committee must be appointed as follows: two members of the senate appointed by the majority leader of the senate of the legislative assembly; one member of the senate appointed by the minority leader of the senate of the legislative assembly; two members of the house of representatives appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives; and one member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. The chairman of the legislative management shall designate the chairman of the committee. The committee shall operate according to the laws and procedures governing the operation of other legislative management interim committees. The committee may recommend legislation relating to workers’ compensation. The committee shall meet once each calendar quarter or less often if the committee chairman determines a meeting that quarter is not necessary because there are no claims to review.

The committee shall review workers’ compensation claims that are brought to the committee by injured workers for the purpose of determining whether changes should be made to the laws relating to workers’ compensation. A claim may not be reviewed by the committee unless workforce safety and insurance has issued a final determination and either the injured worker has exhausted the administrative and judicial appeals process or the period for appeal has expired. In order for the committee to review a claim, the injured worker must first sign a release of information for constituent authorization to allow the committee and legislative council to review the injured worker’s workforce safety and insurance records and to allow the committee members and workforce safety and insurance representatives to discuss the records in an interim committee hearing. Notwithstanding any open meeting requirements, except as otherwise provided under this section, the workforce safety and insurance records of an injured worker whose case is reviewed by the committee are confidential. However, pursuant to the constituent’s authorization, information contained in the records may be discussed by the committee members and workforce safety and insurance representatives in an interim committee hearing.

The committee shall accept testimony of an injured worker and of a representative designated by the injured worker. After the committee has received the testimony of the injured worker and the injured worker’s representative, the committee shall request that workforce safety and insurance provide testimony.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 499. § 1; 2007, ch. 469, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 73.

Note.

The 2007 amendment to this section removed the expiration date.

Section 2 of chapter 499 provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act is effective through July 31, 2007 and after that date is ineffective.”

54-35-23.
Committee on tribal and state relations — Membership — Duties.

The committee on tribal and state relations is composed of seven members as follows:

A chairman designated by the chairman of the legislative management;

Three members of the house of representatives, two of whom must be selected by the leader representing the majority faction of the house of representatives and one of whom must be selected by the leader representing the minority faction of the house of representatives; and

Three members of the senate, two of whom must be selected by the leader representing the majority faction of the senate and one of whom must be selected by the leader representing the minority faction of the senate.

The committee shall meet at such times and places as determined by the chairman. The legislative council shall provide staffing for the committee.

The committee shall conduct joint meetings with the North Dakota tribal governments’ task force to study tribal-state issues, including government-to-government relations, human services, education, corrections, and issues related to the promotion of economic development. After the joint meetings have concluded, the committee shall meet to prepare a report on its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement those recommendations, to the legislative management.

The members of the committee are entitled to compensation from the legislative council for attendance at committee meetings at the rate provided for members of the legislative assembly for attendance at interim committee meetings and are entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in attending the meetings in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

The North Dakota tribal governments’ task force is composed of six members as follows:

The executive director of the Indian affairs commission, or the executive director’s designee;

The chairman of the Standing Rock Sioux Tribe, or the chairman’s designee;

The chairman of the Spirit Lake Tribe, or the chairman’s designee;

The chairman of the Three Affiliated Tribes of the Fort Berthold Reservation, or the chairman’s designee;

The chairman of the Turtle Mountain Band of Chippewa Indians, or the chairman’s designee; and

The chairman of the Sisseton-Wahpeton Oyate of the Lake Traverse Reservation, or the chairman’s designee.

If the executive director of the Indian affairs commission or any of the tribal chairmen appoint a designee to serve on the task force, only one individual may serve as that designee during the biennium. A substitute designee may be appointed by the executive director of the Indian affairs commission or a tribal chairman in the event of the death, incapacity, resignation, or refusal to serve of the initial designee.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 500, § 1; 2007, ch. 470, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, §
74; 2009, ch. 503, § 1; 2011, ch. 412, § 1; 2013, ch. 413, § 1; 2017, ch. 14, § 31, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 413, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Note.

Pursuant to 2019 S.L. ch. 506, §§ 3 and 6, section 54-35-23 is suspended from August 1, 2019 through July 31, 2021. [suspension period ended]

Pursuant to 2017 S.L. ch. 14, §§ 31 and 38,
section 54-35-23 is suspended from July 1, 2017 through July 31, 2019.

The 2013 amendment of this section removed the expiration date of July 31, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section extended the expiration date to July 31, 2013.

The 2007 amendment of this section extended the expiration date to July 30, 2009.

Section 2 of chapter 500 S.L. 2005 provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

This Act is effective through July 31, 2007 and after that date is ineffective.”

54-35-25.
Legislative promotional expenses.

The legislative management shall establish a policy regarding promotional expenses made on behalf of the legislative assembly. Any expenditure made pursuant to this section must be reported to the legislative management. An expenditure under this section may not be construed as a gift for purposes of section 18 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 32, §
10.

Effective Date.

This section is effective July 1, 2013.

54-35-26.
Legislative interim committee review of economic development tax incentives.

The legislative assembly enacts economic development tax incentives with the intent to encourage businesses to locate, grow, and remain in the state; to enhance employment opportunities for citizens; and to foster the most advantageous direction, diversity, and growth of the state economy. The legislative assembly requires systematic, detailed analysis of enacted economic development tax incentives to assure that incentives are, and will continue, serving the intended purposes in a cost-effective and equitable manner consistent with the intent of the legislative assembly. To serve this intent and requirement:

During each interim, the legislative management shall assign to a legislative management interim committee study responsibility that includes completing the analysis of economic development tax incentives as provided in this section and reporting its findings and any associated recommended legislation to the legislative management.

The legislative management interim committee assigned the study responsibility under this section shall analyze each incentive, applying considerations relevant to the perceived goals of the incentive, including any or all of the following:

The extent of achievement of the goals of the incentive and whether unintended consequences have developed in its application.

Whether the design and application of the incentive can be improved.

The extent of complementary or duplicative effect of other incentives or governmental programs.

Whether the incentive has a positive influence on business behavior or rewards business behavior that is likely to have occurred without the incentive.

The effect of the incentive on the state economy, including the extent of primary sector operation of the recipient and any competitive disadvantage imposed or benefit conferred on other state businesses, any benefit or burden created for local government, and the extent of the incentive’s benefit that flows to out-of-state concerns.

The employment opportunities generated by the incentive and the extent those represent career opportunities.

Whether the incentive is the most effective use of state resources to achieve desired goals.

If the committee’s analysis of the incentive is constrained by lack of data, whether statutory or administrative changes should be made to improve collection and availability of data.

The legislative management interim committee assigned the study responsibility under this section may examine economic development tax incentives, shall complete analysis of the incentives it designates for analysis during the interim, and shall approve a plan to provide that each of the economic development tax incentives listed in this subsection is subject to a complete analysis within each six-year period. The interim committee may include in its recommendations any amendments to this section, including amendments to add or remove incentives from the list of incentives subject to analysis under this subsection. Analysis must be completed for economic development tax incentives, including each of the following:

Renaissance zone credits and exemptions.

Research expense credit.

Agricultural commodity processing facility investment credit.

Biodiesel fuel production facility construction or retrofit credit, biodiesel fuel blending credit, and biodiesel fuel equipment credit.

Seed capital investment credit.

Internship program credit.

Angel fund investment credit.

Workforce recruitment credit.

Soybean or canola crushing facility construction or retrofit credit.

Manufacturing automation equipment credit.

New or expanding business exemption.

Manufacturing and recycling equipment sales tax exemption.

Coal severance and conversion tax exemptions.

Oil and gas gross production and oil extraction tax exemptions.

Fuel tax refunds for certain users.

New jobs credit from income tax withholding.

Development or renewal area incentives.

Sales and use tax exemption for materials used to construct a fertilizer or chemical processing facility.

Sales and use tax exemption for materials used in compressing, gathering, collecting, storing, transporting, or injecting carbon dioxide for use in enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas.

Sales and use tax exemption for enterprise information technology equipment and computer software used in a qualified data center.

By October first of each odd-numbered year, the interim committee assigned the study responsibility under this section shall determine and approve:

The economic development tax incentives under subsection 3 which will be designated for analysis during that interim and a plan to provide for analysis of the remaining economic development tax incentives under subsection 3 within the six-year period.

The perceived goals of the legislative assembly in creating or altering each incentive designated for analysis, for use as a baseline for committee analysis of the incentive.

The data and testimony that will be required to conduct an effective analysis of each incentive designated for analysis.

The department of commerce, tax commissioner, economic development foundation, and any other state agency or instrumentality shall provide data and analysis as requested by the interim committee conducting the analysis under this section.

If data is not available, the entity requested to provide the information shall advise the committee how the data could be obtained and the estimated cost of obtaining the data.

If data is available but cannot be shared with the committee, the entity requested to provide the information shall explain the reason and whether there are options that could be used to obtain the data or an adequate substitute for the data.

The interim committee conducting the analysis under this section shall report its findings and recommendations together with any legislation required to implement those recommendations to the legislative management.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 386, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 390, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017, ch. 389, § 1. eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2016; 2017, ch. 277, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-35-26 was amended 3 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 389, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 105; Section 1 of Chapter 390, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1149; and Section 5 of Chapter 277, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2166.

54-35-27.
Legislative interim committee review of state agency fees.

The legislative management shall assign to one or more interim committees a study of selected state agency fees as provided in this section.

By July 1, 2022, each state agency that is authorized to impose forty fees or fewer shall submit a report to the office of management and budget including:

The amount of each fee;

When the fee was implemented;

Why the fee is set at the specific dollar amount;

Where the fee is deposited; and

Whether the fee is critical for the budget of the agency.

By July 1, 2024, each state agency that is authorized to impose more than forty fees shall submit a report to the legislative management including:

The amount of each fee;

When the fee was implemented;

Why the fee is set at the specific dollar amount;

Where the fee is deposited; and

Whether the fee is critical for the budget of the agency.

By September first in the year the reports are received, the office of management and budget shall compile all of the reports into a single report and provide the report to the legislative management.

In addition to the report required under subsection 1, each state agency shall provide an analysis of each fee. The analysis must include:

A comparison of revenue generated by the fee to the cost incurred to provide the services associated with the fee;

The history of the fee, including when it was created and any subsequent changes;

The appropriateness of the fee amount and the affordability of the fee to the public; and

The appropriateness of using other government revenues to pay a portion of services associated with the fee and the effect of the use of other revenues.

An interim committee assigned a fee study shall:

Make a recommendation regarding the fee which identifies whether the fee should remain unchanged or be eliminated, increased, decreased, or otherwise modified and the rationale for the recommendation.

Report its findings and recommendations to the legislative management. As part of its recommendations, the committee shall identify potential state agency fees to be reviewed during the subsequent interim.

Any state agency authorized by the legislative assembly to impose a fee shall provide data, analysis, and other information as requested by the interim committee conducting a study under this section.

Fees to be examined under this section include those deposited in the general fund or the agency operating budget.

If a state agency is unable to meet the deadline imposed under subsection 1, the state agency may appeal to the legislative management for an extension.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, state agencies may not establish any new fees under chapter 28-32 unless the fee was approved by the legislative assembly, the budget section, or the emergency commission.

By July first of each even-numbered year, each agency that has fees shall provide a report to the legislative management indicating whether any fees were added, deleted, or changed during the course of the biennium.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 408, § 1, effective April 22, 2021.